Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 27.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1027
Year of application, defined.

Year of application
means the year that a completed application is filed under the Nebraska Advantage
Transformational Tourism and Redevelopment Act.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 27.